Maryland, session 2026, HB0302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
4–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Authority” means the Maryland Transportation Authority.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0302*

HOUSE BILL 302
4–408.
THE AUTHORITY SHALL DESIGN AND LOCATE THE ENTRANCES, EXITS, AND
THE ASSOCIATED ROADS OF THE NEW BRIDGE OVER THE PATAPSCO RIVER THAT
WILL REPLACE THE COLLAPSED FRANCIS SCOTT KEY BRIDGE TO ENSURE THAT A
VEHICLE THAT WILL NOT CROSS THE BRIDGE IS NOT REQUIRED TO PAY A TOLL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.